nursery/apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
    <pardef n="spreig__vblex">
      <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eamaid</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ibh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="c/ealla__n">
      <e><p><l>ealla</l><r>ealla<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ille</l><r>ealla<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>illtean</l><r>ealla<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>illtean</l><r>ealla<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="maighd/eann-phòsaidh__n">
      <e><p><l>eann-phòsaidh</l><r>eann-phòsaidh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inn-pòsaidh</l><r>eann-phòsaidh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innean-pòsaidh</l><r>eann-phòsaidh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innean-pòsaidh</l><r>eann-phòsaidh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="iomla/n__adj">
      <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="parado/cs__n">
      <e><p><l>cs</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ics</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>csan</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>csan</l><r>cs<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="cealla"><par n="initial-c"/><i></i><par n="c/ealla__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maighdeann-phòsaidh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aighd</i><par n="maighd/eann-phòsaidh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paradocs"><par n="initial-p"/><i>arado</i><par n="parado/cs__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iomlan"><i>iomla</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neòghlan"><i>neòghla</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="easlan"><i>easla</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="loma-làn"><i>loma-là</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neo-iomlan"><i>neo-iomla</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bith-bhuan"><i>bith-bhua</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diombuan"><i>diombua</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neo-bhuan"><i>neo-bhua</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ceannan"><i>ceanna</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neo-chlaon"><i>neo-chlao</i><par n="iomla/n__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spreig"><i>spreig</i><par n="spreig__vblex"/></e>
